Connecticut, session 2026, HB05460.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Entity" has the same meaning as provided in section 20-474 of the
general statutes;
(2) "Fire protection" means the prevention and suppression of fires,
the investigation of the origin and cause of fires, the response to
hazardous materials incidents and technical rescues;
(3) "Municipality" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-148
of the general statutes;
(4) "District or subdivision" includes any entity or subdivision of a
municipality with a responsibility for fire protection services pursuant
to statute, charter or ordinance; and
(5) "National Emergency Response Information System" means the
national data system developed or designated by the United States Fire
Administration, or its successor system, for the collection, reporting and
analysis of fire and emergency incident data.

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
(b) On or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each fire
protection entity responsible for providing fire protection services
within one or more of the geographic areas of a municipality shall
register with such municipality. Such registration shall include, but
need not be limited to, the demographic information of the geographic
area served by such entity and the name and contact information of such
entity. Such entity shall file amendments to the registration reporting
any material change to the information contained in such registration
not later than thirty days after the entity knows or should know of such
material change.
(c) Each municipality shall enter such registration and the
demographic and contact information related to such entities in the
National Emergency Response Information System. The municipality
shall maintain and review such demographic and contact information
not less than annually.
(d) On or before July 1, 2027, each municipality shall establish a local
fire protection plan and submit such plan to the chief elected officer,
legislative body and emergency management director of such
municipality. Each municipality may submit such plan to the State Fire
Administrator, unless the Commission on Fire Prevention and Control
requires the submission of such plan to the State Fire Administrator
pursuant to subsection (b) of section 7-323l, in which case such plan shall
be submitted in the form and manner specified by the commission. Such
plan shall include, but need not be limited to:
(1) A general statement of how fire protection services are provided
within the municipality;
(2) A disclosure of the districts or subdivisions responsible for fire
protection services throughout all geographic areas within the
municipality;
Public Act No. 26-144 2 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
(3) The name of each fire protection entity responsible for providing
fire protection services within one or more of the geographic areas of
such municipality;
(4) A description of any written agreements or contracts between the
municipality and the entities that provide fire protection services to the
municipality;
(5) An identification of the specific geographic boundaries of the
areas within the municipality that are served by each entity that
provides fire protection services to the municipality;
(6) The name of the person, including, but not limited to, the fire chief,
responsible for each fire protection entity that provides fire protection
services to the municipality;
(7) A description of the fire protection performance standards to
which the municipality adheres, including, but not limited to, response
times, minimum fireground staffing levels and apparatus requirements;
(8) A description of the process used for collecting and tracking
personnel and response data, including, but not limited to, any software
used; and
(9) A description of any mutual aid agreements to which the
municipality is a party.
(e) If, pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of section 7-323l of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, the Commission on Fire
Prevention and Control establishes a standardized protocol, the State
Fire Administrator shall, not less than once every five years, review and
assign a rating to each local fire protection plan submitted to the State
Fire Administrator pursuant to subsection (c) of this section in
accordance with such standardized protocol. The State Fire
Administrator (1) may require any municipality whose local fire
Public Act No. 26-144 3 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
protection plan is assigned an unsatisfactory rating to submit a
performance improvement plan not later than ninety days after the
assignment of such unsatisfactory rating, and (2) shall assist such
municipality with the development of such performance improvement
plan.
(f) On and after July 1, 2032, and every five years thereafter, each
municipality shall review, and revise as needed, its local fire protection
plan and may communicate any substantial changes to such plan to the
State Fire Administrator.
Sec. 2. Section 7-323l of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) The commission shall:
(1) Recommend minimum standards of education and physical
condition for candidates for any firefighter position;
(2) Recommend minimum standards for firefighter safety and
emergency response protocols. Such standards and protocols shall
address, but need not be limited to, operational safety strategies used
during fire suppression operations, hazardous materials mitigation and
technical rescue operations and methods for ensuring the health and
wellness of fire service personnel;
[(2)] (3) Establish standards for fire service training and education
programs, and develop and conduct an examination program to certify
those fire service personnel who satisfactorily demonstrate their ability
to meet the requirements of the fire service training and education
program standards;
[(3)] (4) Establish an optional fire service training and education
program that provides information relative to the blue envelopes
Public Act No. 26-144 4 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
designed pursuant to section 14-11j and yellow envelopes designed
pursuant to section 14-11l and techniques for the handling of incidents,
such as wandering, that involve juveniles and adults with autism
spectrum disorder, cognitive impairment or nonverbal learning
disorder, provided the curriculum for such techniques is made available
at no cost from (A) institutions of higher education, health care
professionals or advocacy organizations that are concerned with
juveniles and adults with autism spectrum disorder, cognitive
impairment or nonverbal learning disorder, or (B) collaborations of such
institutions, professionals or organizations;
[(4)] (5) Conduct fire fighting training and education programs
designed to assist firefighters in developing and maintaining their skills
and keeping abreast of technological advances in fire suppression, fire
protection, fire prevention and related fields;
[(5)] (6) Recommend standards for promotion to the various ranks of
fire departments;
[(6)] (7) Be authorized, with the approval of the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection, to apply for, receive and
distribute any state, federal or private funds or contributions available
for training and education of fire fighting personnel;
[(7)] (8) Recommend that the Commissioner of Emergency Services
and Public Protection approve or reject the establishment of, or, when
appropriate, suspend or revoke the approval of, regional fire schools in
accordance with section 7-323u;
[(8)] (9) Advise the Division of Fire Services Administration within
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection on the
management of the Statewide Fire Service Disaster Response Plan;
[(9)] (10) Implement the recommendations of the study of the fire
service authorized pursuant to subdivision (36) of subsection (b) of
Public Act No. 26-144 5 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
section 41 of public act 23-204; and
[(10)] (11) Submit to the Governor, the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
and security, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, and the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection an annual
report (A) relating to the activities, recommendations and
accomplishments of the commission, and (B) making recommendations
on the funding necessary for the operation of, the maintenance of and
capital improvements to the state fire school and regional fire schools.
(b) The commission may:
(1) [recommend] Recommend, and the Commissioner of Emergency
Services and Public Protection may adopt, regulations in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54 as necessary to implement the
provisions of this section;
(2) Require municipalities to submit local fire protection plans, and
any revisions to such plans, to the State Fire Administrator;
(3) Establish, in coordination with the State Fire Administrator, a (A)
standardized protocol by which the State Fire Administrator shall
review, not less than once every five years, local fire protection plans
and assign a rating to such plan based on such standardized protocol,
and (B) standardized classification system by which the State Fire
Administrator may evaluate and grade the operational performance of
the fire protection services provided by each municipality or fire district.
In establishing such standardized classification system, the commission
shall consider nationally recognized standards, including, but not
limited to, standards developed by the National Fire Protection
Association and the Center for Public Safety Excellence; and
(4) Require the submission of operational data by each fire protection
entity in the state and specify the form and manner of such submission.
Public Act No. 26-144 6 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
The commissioner shall submit such requirement to the State Fire
Administrator for adoption.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"municipality" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-148 of the
general statutes.
(b) In the event fire protection services in a municipality are
discontinued or interrupted, including, but not limited to, the
dissolution or cessation of operations of any fire department, fire district
or fire company, the municipality shall take such actions as necessary to
ensure the continuation and uninterrupted provision of fire protection
services within its territorial limits, except as otherwise provided by
special act or municipal charter. Such actions may include, but need not
be limited to, the establishment or operation of a municipal fire
department, the entering into of contracts or agreements for fire
protection services, the designation of a temporary or permanent
provider or participation in a mutual aid or regional fire service
arrangement.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section and
sections 5 and 6 of this act:
(1) "Fire protection" has the same meaning as provided in section 1 of
this act; and
(2) "Municipality" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-148
of the general statutes.
(b) There is established within the Division of Fire Services
Administration within the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection a program to be known as "Connecticut Fire". The
purpose of the Connecticut Fire program shall be to establish a
framework for the state to provide administrative and operational
assistance to municipalities or fire authorities that choose to receive such
Public Act No. 26-144 7 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
assistance. The program shall include, but not be limited to, provisions
for resident firefighters to staff and augment volunteer fire departments
and fire districts with paid personnel while preserving the local
autonomy and command structures of fire protection services.
(c) The State Fire Administrator shall oversee the Connecticut Fire
program. Upon approval of the framework for the Connecticut Fire
program by the Commission on Fire Prevention and Control pursuant
to section 6 of this act, the State Fire Administrator may include in a
budget request for the subsequent fiscal year the cost of implementing
such framework. Upon the inclusion of appropriations for said program
in an approved state budget, the State Fire Administrator shall, within
available appropriations, implement such framework.
(d) The Connecticut Fire program may utilize the facilities and
equipment of the Connecticut Fire Academy, the Forestry Division of
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection and the
regional fire schools to achieve the objectives of the program.
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) Upon implementation of the
Connecticut Fire program by the State Fire Administrator pursuant to
the provisions of section 4 of this act, the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management shall administer a Connecticut Fire grant program.
Pursuant to said grant program, the secretary shall provide grants-in-
aid to municipalities that participate in the Connecticut Fire program to
incentivize the regionalization of fire protection services and the sharing
of fire protection resources among municipalities. A municipality may
submit an application for a grant under this subsection in a form and
manner prescribed by the secretary.
(b) Not later than the start of the subsequent fiscal year after
awarding the first grant under the Connecticut Fire grant program, the
secretary shall submit a report on the grant program to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
Public Act No. 26-144 8 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
matters relating to public safety and security in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes. Such report shall
include, but need not be limited to, an accounting of the grants paid
pursuant to the program, a description of each grant awarded under the
program and an evaluation of the success of the program and the fire
protection services funded under this section.
Sec. 6. (Effective from passage) (a) The Comptroller shall establish a
working group to develop the administrative, operational, fiscal and
personnel framework for the Connecticut Fire program, established
pursuant to section 4 of this act.
(b) The working group shall include, but need not be limited to:
(1) The Comptroller, or the Comptroller's designee;
(2) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee;
(3) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
or the commissioner's designee;
(4) The State Fire Administrator, or the administrator's designee;
(5) The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the Commission on Fire
Prevention and Control, or their designees;
(6) Three members of the Joint Council of Connecticut Fire Service
Organizations, who shall be appointed by the joint council;
(7) The executive director of the Connecticut Conference of
Municipalities if such executive director agrees to participate in the
working group, or the executive director's designee; and
(8) The executive director of the Council of Small Towns if such
executive director agrees to participate in the working group, or the
Public Act No. 26-144 9 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
executive director's designee.
(c) The Comptroller shall: (1) Schedule the first meeting of the
working group, which shall be held not later than sixty days after the
effective date of this section; and (2) select two cochairpersons from
among the members of the working group.
(d) Not later than September 1, 2027, the Comptroller shall submit the
recommended framework for the Connecticut Fire program developed
by the working group to the Commission on Fire Prevention and
Control. The Comptroller may terminate the working group on the date
that the commission approves such framework pursuant to subsection
(e) of this section or January 1, 2028, whichever is later.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Commission on Fire Prevention
and Control shall (1) review the working group's recommended
framework for the Connecticut Fire program, (2) approve such
framework, with or without modifications, and (3) submit the approved
framework to the State Fire Administrator.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) The State Fire Administrator
shall coordinate with the Division of Emergency Management and
Homeland Security within the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection to establish fire service regions within the state that
match the emergency preparedness regions established by said division.
The State Fire Administrator shall appoint, subject to confirmation by
the Commission on Fire Prevention and Control, a regional fire
coordinator for each such region. In any region where a recognized
regional fire chiefs' organization exists, such organization may submit
to the State Fire Administrator recommendations for candidates for
regional fire coordinator for such region.
(b) Each regional fire coordinator shall serve in a voluntary,
nonsalaried capacity as a liaison between the Division of Fire Services
Public Act No. 26-144 10 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
Administration within the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection and the local fire departments within the region
served by such regional fire coordinator for the purposes of facilitating
the Connecticut Fire program established pursuant to section 4 of this
act and coordinating fire protection resources through such region. For
the purposes of this subsection, "fire protection" has the same meaning
as provided in section 1 of this act.
(c) The State Fire Administrator may submit a plan to the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection to
transition the position of regional fire coordinator to a salaried
employee position. Upon approval of such plan, the commissioner may
include such position in the estimates of expenditure requirements in
accordance with the provisions of section 4-77 of the general statutes.
Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection, in coordination with the office of the
Comptroller, shall, within the availability of appropriations approved
for such purpose, establish and maintain a system for collecting
computer-aided dispatch data pursuant to the provisions of subsection
(f) of section 28-25b of the general statutes, as amended by this act. The
department shall aggregate such data and monitor information
regarding emergency services requests managed by fire departments
and emergency medical services providers.
Sec. 9. Subsection (f) of section 28-25b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(f) [On and after January 1, 2001, each] Each public safety answering
point and regional emergency telecommunications center shall submit
to the division, on a quarterly basis, a report of all 9-1-1 calls for services
received through the enhanced 9-1-1 service and the next generation 9-
1-1 telecommunication system by the public safety answering point or
Public Act No. 26-144 11 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
regional emergency telecommunications center. Such report shall
include, but not be limited to, the following information: (1) The number
of 9-1-1 calls during the reporting quarter; [and] (2) for each such call,
the elapsed time period from the time the call was received to the time
the call was answered, and the elapsed time period from the time the
call was answered to the time the call was transferred or terminated,
expressed in time ranges or fractile response times; and (3) any other
information requested by the division for inclusion in the system
established and maintained by the Department of Emergency Services
and Public Protection pursuant to the provisions of section 8 of this act.
The information required under this subsection shall be produced using
data generated from a computer-aided dispatch system if a public safety
answering point or regional emergency telecommunications center
utilizes such system, and may be submitted in any written or electronic
form selected by such public safety answering point or regional
emergency telecommunications center and approved by the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection, provided
the commissioner shall take into consideration the needs of such public
safety answering point or regional emergency telecommunications
center in approving such written or electronic form. On a quarterly
basis, the division shall make such information available to the public
and [shall post such information on its Internet web site] input such
information in the system established pursuant to section 8 of this act.
Sec. 10. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) The office of the
Comptroller, in coordination with the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection, shall study the feasibility of centralizing
within one state agency access to all public benefits available to
firefighters, including, but not limited to, claims related to the
firefighters cancer relief account established pursuant to section 7-313h
of the general statutes, claims related to the Fallen Hero Fund
established pursuant to section 3-122a of the general statutes, injury
claims, workers' compensation claims and disability claims. Such access
Public Act No. 26-144 12 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
to benefits through one state agency shall include, but need not be
limited to, such state agency making eligibility determinations,
receiving applications and disseminating information for such benefits.
(b) Not later than July 1 2027, the Comptroller shall submit, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to public safety and security a report on
the results of the study conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section.
Sec. 11. Subsection (b) of section 7-323o of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) The Division of Fire Services Administration shall:
(1) Administer federal funds and grants allocated to the fire services
of the state;
(2) Provide technical assistance and guidance to fire fighting forces of
any state or municipal agency;
(3) Develop a centralized information and audiovisual library
regarding fire prevention and control;
(4) Accumulate, disseminate and analyze fire prevention data;
(5) Recommend specifications of fire service materials and equipment
and assist in the purchasing thereof;
(6) Assist in mutual aid coordination;
(7) Coordinate fire programs with those of the other states;
(8) Assist in communications coordination;
Public Act No. 26-144 13 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
(9) Establish and maintain a fire service information program;
(10) Review and approve the purchase of fire apparatus or equipment
at state institutions, facilities and properties;
(11) Recommend and provide reports on revisions to statutes relating
to firefighter training and fire prevention and control;
(12) Advise and assist the Commission on Fire Prevention and
Control regarding legislative proposals;
(13) Encourage the expansion and improvement of existing regional
firefighter training facilities in cooperation with the Commission on Fire
Prevention and Control;
(14) Administer the state fire school and regional fire schools;
(15) Administer certification examinations, testing procedures and
reciprocity recognition for credentials in the fire service disciplines;
(16) Manage the Statewide Fire Service Disaster Response Plan, with
the advice of the Commission on Fire Prevention and Control; [and]
(17) Make recommendations to the Commission on Fire Prevention
and Control and the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection pertaining to the operational funding of the state fire school
and regional fire schools; and
(18) Not later than July 1, 2027, establish, and annually thereafter
update as needed, a registry identifying the fire chief for each
municipality and fire district in the state.
Sec. 12. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Not later than July 1, 2027, the
office of the Comptroller, in coordination with the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection, shall establish and maintain
a registry of all career and volunteer firefighters in the state, for the
Public Act No. 26-144 14 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
purpose of verifying such firefighters' training, credentials and benefit
eligibility.
Sec. 13. Section 14-96q of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A permit is required for the use of colored or flashing lights on all
motor vehicles or equipment specified in this section except: (1) Motor
vehicles not registered in this state used for transporting or escorting
any vehicle or load, or combinations thereof, which is either oversize or
overweight, or both, when operating under a permit issued by the
Commissioner of Transportation pursuant to section 14-270; or (2)
motor vehicles or equipment that are (A) equipped with lights in
accordance with this section, (B) owned or leased by the federal
government, the state of Connecticut, or any other state, commonwealth
or local municipality, and (C) registered to such governmental entity.
When used in this section, the term "flashing" shall be considered to
include the term "revolving".
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, or such other person
specifically identified in this section, may issue permits for the use of
colored or flashing lights on vehicles in accordance with this section, at
the commissioner's or such person's discretion. Any person, firm or
corporation other than the state or any metropolitan district, town, city
or borough shall pay an annual permit fee of twenty dollars to the
commissioner for each such vehicle. Such fee shall apply only to permits
issued by the commissioner.
(c) A [flashing] blue light or lights, including flashing blue lights, may
be used on a motor vehicle operated by an active member of a volunteer
fire department or company or an active member of an organized civil
preparedness auxiliary fire company who has been issued a permit by
the chief executive officer of such department or company to use such a
[flashing] blue light or lights while on the way to or at the scene of a fire
Public Act No. 26-144 15 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
or other emergency requiring such member's services. Such permit shall
be on a form provided by the commissioner and may be revoked by such
chief executive officer or such chief executive officer's successor. The
chief executive officer of each volunteer fire department or company or
organized civil preparedness auxiliary fire company shall keep on file,
on forms provided by the commissioner, the names and addresses of
members who have been authorized to use a [flashing] blue light or
lights as provided in this subsection. Such listing shall also designate the
registration number of the motor vehicle on which an authorized [a
flashing] blue light or lights are to be used.
(d) A flashing green or blue light or lights may be used on a motor
vehicle operated by an active member of a volunteer ambulance
association or company who has been issued a permit by the chief
executive officer of such association or company to use such a light or
lights, while on the way to or at the scene of an emergency requiring
such member's services. Such permit shall be on a form provided by the
commissioner and may be revoked by such chief executive officer or
such chief executive officer's successor. The chief executive officer of
each volunteer ambulance association or company shall keep on file, on
forms provided by the commissioner, the names and addresses of
members who have been authorized to use a flashing green or blue light
or lights as provided in this subsection. Such listing shall also designate
the registration number of the motor vehicle on which the authorized
flashing green or blue light or lights are to be used.
(e) The commissioner may issue a permit for a [flashing] red light or
lights, including flashing red lights, which may be used on a motor
vehicle or equipment (1) used by paid fire chiefs and their deputies and
assistants, up to a total of five individuals per department, (2) used by
volunteer fire chiefs and their deputies and assistants, up to a total of
five individuals per department, (3) used by members of the fire police
on a stationary vehicle as a warning signal during traffic directing
Public Act No. 26-144 16 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
operations at the scene of a fire or emergency, (4) used by chief executive
officers of emergency medical service organizations, as defined in
section 19a-175, the first or second deputies, or if there are no deputies,
the first or second assistants, of such an organization that is a municipal
or volunteer or licensed organization, (5) used by local fire marshals, (6)
used by directors of emergency management, including, but not limited
to, the deputy commissioner of the Division of Emergency Management
and Homeland Security within the Department of Emergency Services
and Public Protection and the regional coordinators for said division, or
(7) used by a constable, appointed pursuant to an ordinance authorized
by section 9-185 or elected pursuant to section 9-200, on a stationary
vehicle as a warning signal during traffic directing operations.
(f) The commissioner may issue a permit for a yellow or amber light
or lights, including a flashing yellow or amber light or lights, which may
be used on motor vehicles or equipment that are (1) specified in
subsection (e) of this section, (2) maintenance vehicles, or (3) vehicles
transporting or escorting any vehicle or load or combinations thereof,
which is or are either oversize or overweight, or both, and being
operated or traveling under a permit issued by the Commissioner of
Transportation pursuant to section 14-270. A yellow or amber light or
lights, including a flashing yellow or amber light or lights, may be used
without obtaining a permit from the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles
on wreckers registered pursuant to section 14-66, on vehicles of carriers
in rural mail delivery service or on vehicles operated by construction
inspectors employed by the state of Connecticut, authorized by the
Commissioner of Transportation, used during the performance of
inspections on behalf of the state. The Commissioner of Transportation
shall maintain a list of such authorized construction inspectors,
including the name and address of each inspector and the registration
number for each vehicle on which the light or lights are to be used.
(g) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may issue a permit for a
Public Act No. 26-144 17 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
white light or lights, including a flashing white light or lights, which
may be used on a motor vehicle or equipment as specified in subdivision
(1), (2), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (e) of this section. A vehicle being
operated by a member of a volunteer fire department or company or a
volunteer emergency medical technician may use flashing white head
lamps, provided such member or emergency medical technician is on
the way to the scene of a fire or medical emergency and has received
written authorization from the chief law enforcement officer of the
municipality to use such head lamps. Such head lamps shall only be
used within the municipality granting such authorization or from a
personal residence or place of employment, if located in an adjoining
municipality. Such authorization may be revoked for use of such head
lamps in violation of this subdivision. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "flashing white lights" shall not include the
simultaneous flashing of head lamps.
(h) The commissioner may issue a permit for emergency vehicles, as
defined in subsection (a) of section 14-283, to use a blue, red, yellow, or
white light or lights, including a flashing light or lights or any
combination thereof. [, except as provided in subsection (k) of this
section.]
(i) The commissioner may issue a permit for ambulances, as defined
in section 19a-175, which may, in addition to the flashing light or lights
allowed in subsection (h) of this section, use flashing lights of other
colors specified by federal requirements for the manufacture of an
ambulance. If the commissioner issues a permit for any ambulance, such
permit shall be issued at the time of registration and upon each renewal
of such registration.
(j) A green, yellow or amber light or lights, including a flashing green,
yellow or amber light or lights or any combination thereof, may be used
on a maintenance vehicle owned and operated by the Department of
Transportation.
Public Act No. 26-144 18 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5460
[(k) No person, other than a police officer or inspector of the
Department of Motor Vehicles operating a state or local police vehicle,
shall operate a motor vehicle displaying a steady blue or steady red
illuminated light or both steady blue and steady red illuminated lights
that are visible externally from the front of the vehicle.]
[(l)] (k) Use of colored and flashing lights except as authorized by this
section shall be an infraction.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-144 19 of 19